District of Columbia statutes.
13-302.01

Service by Metropolitan Police Department.

(a)

The Metropolitan Police Department shall execute, upon request, a bench warrant in any case in which paternity establishment or child support is at issue.

(b)

The Metropolitan Police Department shall serve civil process in any case in which paternity establishment or child support is at issue and shall serve the process at the request of the IV-D agency in any IV-D case. In a non-IV-D case, a judicial officer may order the Metropolitan Police Department to serve process pursuant to this section or to accompany a private process server upon a finding of danger to the process server or a finding that the respondent is evading service. The affidavit of a private process server shall be considered sufficient evidence for a finding of danger or evasion of service.

(c)

A special unit that consists of at least 4 police officers shall be established for the exclusive purpose of performing the duties enumerated in section 13-302.01(a) and (b).

(d)

The IV-D agency shall provide funds to the Metropolitan Police Department to pay for the full cost, including administrative costs, of providing the services in section 13-302.01(a) and (b) in all IV-D cases.

June 18, 1991, D.C. Law 9-5, § 3(b), 38 DCR 2717
Aug. 17, 1991, D.C. Law 9-39, § 3(b), 38 DCR 4970
1981 Ed., § 13-302.1.
Section 25(b) of D.C. Law 15-354 provided that the section designation of § 13-302.1 of the District of Columbia Official Code is redesignated as § 13-302.01.